Washington statutes.
RCW 11.86.061

Effect of spendthrift or similar restriction.

A beneficiary may disclaim under this chapter notwithstanding any limitation on the interest of the beneficiary in the nature of a spendthrift provision or similar restriction.

[ 1989 c 34 s 6.]